Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 4

Correction of Errors

69-5-401. Mistake in the number of acres — Correction.

Whenever a district has been established or is being established and a mistake has been made as to the number of acres assessed to the owner of any tract of land embraced in the district, the decree in the cause fixing or adjudging the number of acres shall not be final until the assessment roll provided by statute to be made by the directors has been reported to the court by the directors and decree has been entered confirming the acres; and when any such mistake shall have been made, the aggrieved person may file a petition in the county court in which the cause is pending, seeking to have the mistake corrected.

Acts 1921, ch. 144, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 3871a51b1; Code 1932, § 4269; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1001; T.C.A. §69-6-401.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

Cross-References. Circuit court defined, §69-5-102.

69-5-402. Mistake in number of acres — Notice — Hearing — Decree.

Upon the filing of such petition, the county clerk shall give at least ten (10) days' written notice to all the directors of the district of the filing of the petition and at any time after twenty (20) days from the service of such notice on the directors the matter may be heard by the court, either upon oral testimony or upon depositions or on documentary evidence and on all the records in the cause, or on all such evidence, and the court shall render decree according to the merits of the controversy.

Acts 1921, ch. 144, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 3871a51b2; Code 1932, § 4270; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1002; T.C.A. §69-6-402.

69-5-403. Mistake in acres — Appeal.

From a decree correcting a mistake in the number of acres, either side may appeal upon the same terms and conditions and to the same courts as provided for appeal from the decree on commissioners' reports fixing the acres assessed to each owner.

Acts 1921, ch. 144, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 3871a51b3; Code 1932, § 4271; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1003; T.C.A. §69-6-403.

69-5-404. Mistake in acres — Correction after decree has been made final.

No such petition shall be filed or heard after the decree has been rendered upon the directors' report upon assessment roll and the number of acres assessed to each owner, and the boundaries of land so assessed to the owner shall be final after the rendering of the decree upon the report on assessment roll, except as provided in §69-5-305.

Acts 1921, ch. 144, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 3871a51b4; Code 1932, § 4272; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1004; T.C.A. §69-6-404.

69-5-405. Mistake in owner's identity — Correction.

When a mistake has been made by which the lands belonging to one person have been assessed to or in the name of another person or as embraced within the boundaries set out for a tract assessed to another person, the original decree fixing such assessment shall not be final, and any aggrieved party may file a petition in the county court in which the drainage or levee cause is pending to correct such mistake and to correct the assessments and all decrees, reports, blueprints, and plats accordingly.

Upon the filing of such petition, the county clerk shall give ten (10) days' written notice to the person or persons to whom it is claimed that such land should have been assessed, and at any time within twenty (20) days after the service of such notice, the cause may be heard by the court as provided for hearing causes in § 69-5-402, and the court shall render decree according to the merits of the controversy.

If the court decrees that such mistake was made, then by decree all the reports, decrees, blueprints, maps, and plats shall be amended and corrected accordingly.

In case any assessment or assessments of any land thus newly assessed to any person is or are past due, whether they have been paid by the aggrieved person or not, they shall be collected by the county trustee immediately and shall become delinquent and shall be proceeded against as delinquent as now provided by law for proceeding in the matter of delinquent assessment, unless paid within sixty (60) days after rendering such decree. If any of the assessment has been previously collected by the trustee from the aggrieved party in the petition, it shall be refunded to the aggrieved party by the trustee upon warrant drawn as now provided by law for the drawing and issuing of warrants in the matter of drainage and levee districts.

Acts 1921, ch. 144, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 3871a51b5; Code 1932, § 4273; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1005; T.C.A. §69-6-405.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

69-5-406. Mistake in owner's identity — Appeal.

From a decree of the county court correcting a mistake in the owner's identity, any aggrieved party may appeal to the circuit court of the county, upon giving bonds for costs within ten (10) days after the decree in such amount as the county court may fix, and the cause shall be heard de novo in the circuit court, and from the judgment of such circuit court, appeals shall lie as provided by the Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure.

Acts 1921, ch. 144, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 3871a51b6; Code 1932, § 4274; Acts 1981, ch. 449, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1006; T.C.A. §69-6-406.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

For appeals from circuit court, see T.R.A.P. 3(e).

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

69-5-407. Mistake in owner's identity — Certified copy of decree recorded by clerk and transmitted to trustee.

A certified copy of the decree in a case of a mistake in the owner's identity shall be certified by the clerk of the court to the clerk of the county having possession of the “drainage record” book of the district, and the clerk shall copy the decree on the drainage record book as a part of the records of the drainage district, and file the decree among the papers in the cause in which the drainage district was established. The county clerk shall also certify a copy of the decree from the drainage record book to the trustee of the county charged with the collection of the assessments against the property affected by the decree, and the trustee shall note the changes on the trustee's “drainage assessment book”, which has been made out and delivered to the trustee by the county clerk, and thereafter collect the assessments on the property according to the changes so made in the decree.

Acts 1921, ch. 144, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 3871a51b7; Code 1932, § 4275; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1007; T.C.A. §69-6-407.

Cross-References. Drainage assessment book, §69-5-813.

Drainage record book, §69-5-140.